Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Part 1. General Provisions
38-33.3-123.
Enforcement - limitation.

If any unit owner fails to timely pay assessments or any money or sums due to the association, the association may require reimbursement for collection costs and reasonable attorney fees and costs incurred as a result of such failure without the necessity of commencing a legal proceeding.

For any failure to comply with the provisions of this article or any provision of the declaration, bylaws, articles, or rules and regulations, other than the payment of assessments or any money or sums due to the association, the association, any unit owner, or any class of unit owners adversely affected by the failure to comply may seek reimbursement for collection costs and reasonable attorney fees and costs incurred as a result of such failure to comply, without the necessity of commencing a legal proceeding.

In any civil action to enforce or defend the provisions of this article or of the declaration, bylaws, articles, or rules and regulations, the court shall award reasonable attorney fees, costs, and costs of collection to the prevailing party.

Notwithstanding paragraph (c) of this subsection (1), in connection with any claim in which a unit owner is alleged to have violated a provision of this article or of the declaration, bylaws, articles, or rules and regulations of the association and in which the court finds that the unit owner prevailed because the unit owner did not commit the alleged violation:

The court shall award the unit owner reasonable attorney fees and costs incurred in asserting or defending the claim; and

The court shall not award costs or attorney fees to the association. In addition, the association shall be precluded from allocating to the unit owner’s account with the association any of the association’s costs or attorney fees incurred in asserting or defending the claim.

A unit owner shall not be deemed to have confessed judgment to attorney fees or collection costs.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, no action shall be commenced or maintained to enforce the terms of any building restriction contained in the provisions of the declaration, bylaws, articles, or rules and regulations or to compel the removal of any building or improvement because of the violation of the terms of any such building restriction unless the action is commenced within one year from the date from which the person commencing the action knew or in the exercise of reasonable diligence should have known of the violation for which the action is sought to be brought or maintained.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1714, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 1087, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 2005:

(1) amended, p. 1376, § 5, effective January 1, 2006.

L. 2006:

(1)(c) amended, p. 1217, § 4, effective May 26.

38-33.3-124.
Legislative declaration - alternative dispute resolution encouraged - policy statement required.

The general assembly finds and declares that the cost, complexity, and delay inherent in court proceedings make litigation a particularly inefficient means of resolving neighborhood disputes. Therefore, common interest communities are encouraged to adopt protocols that make use of mediation or arbitration as alternatives to, or preconditions upon, the filing of a complaint between a unit owner and association in situations that do not involve an imminent threat to the peace, health, or safety of the community.

The general assembly hereby specifically endorses and encourages associations, unit owners, managers, declarants, and all other parties to disputes arising under this article to agree to make use of all available public or private resources for alternative dispute resolution, including, without limitation, the resources offered by the office of dispute resolution within the Colorado judicial branch through its website.

On or before January 1, 2007, each association shall adopt a written policy setting forth its procedure for addressing disputes arising between the association and unit owners. The association shall make a copy of this policy available to unit owners upon request.

Any controversy between an association and a unit owner arising out of the provisions of this article may be submitted to mediation by agreement of the parties prior to the commencement of any legal proceeding.

The mediation agreement, if one is reached, may be presented to the court as a stipulation. Either party to the mediation may terminate the mediation process without prejudice.

If either party subsequently violates the stipulation, the other party may apply immediately to the court for relief.

The declaration, bylaws, or rules of the association may specify situations in which disputes shall be resolved by binding arbitration under the uniform arbitration act, part 2 of article 22 of title 13, C.R.S., or by another means of alternative dispute resolution under the “Dispute Resolution Act”, part 3 of article 22 of title 13, C.R.S.

History.

Source:
L. 98:

Entire section added, p. 471, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 1377, § 6, effective January 1, 2006.

L. 2006:

(1) amended, p. 1218, § 5, effective May 26.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 557, § 3, effective July 1.